Vermont statutes. Title 14 Decedents’ Estates and Fiduciary Relations
Part 3. Receipts Normally Apportioned

§ 3358.
Insubstantial allocations not required.

If a trustee determines that an allocation between principal and income required by section 3359, 3360, 3361, 3362, or 3365 of this title is insubstantial, the trustee may allocate the entire amount to principal unless one of the circumstances described in subsection 3324(c) of this title applies to the allocation. This power may be exercised by a cotrustee in the circumstances described in subsection 3324(d) of this title and may be released for the reasons and in the manner described in subsection 3324(e) of this title. An allocation is presumed to be insubstantial if:

the amount of the allocation would increase or decrease net income in an accounting period, as determined before the allocation, by less than 10 percent; or

the value of the asset producing the receipt for which the allocation would be made is less than 10 percent of the total value of the trust’s assets at the beginning of the accounting period.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 114

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

HistoryComment

This section is intended to relieve a trustee from making relatively small allocations while preserving the trustee’s right to do so if an allocation is large in terms of absolute dollars.

For example, assume that a trust’s assets, which include a working interest in an oil well, have a value of $1,000,000; the net income from the assets other than the working interest is $40,000; and the net receipts from the working interest are $400.
The trustee may allocate all of the net receipts from the working interest to principal instead of allocating 10%, or $40, to income under section 3361.
If the net receipts from the working interest are $35,000, so that the amount allocated to income under section 3361 would be $3,500, the trustee may decide that this amount is sufficiently significant to the income beneficiary that the allocation provided for by section 3361 should be made, even though the trustee is still permitted under section 3358 to allocate all of the net receipts to principal because the $3,500 would increase the net income of $40,000, as determined before making an allocation under section 3361, by less than 10%. Section 3358 will also relieve a trustee from having to allocate net receipts from the sale of trees in a small woodlot between principal and income.

While the allocation to principal of small amounts under this section should not be a cause for concern for tax purposes, allocations are not permitted under this section in circumstances described in subsection 3324(c) to eliminate claims that the power in this section has adverse tax consequences.

§ 3359.
Deferred compensation, annuities, and similar payments.

In this section:

“Payment” means a payment that a trustee may receive over a fixed number of years or during the life of one or more individuals because of services rendered or property transferred to the payer in exchange for future payments. The term includes a payment made in money or property from the payer’s general assets or from a separate fund created by the payer. For purposes of subsections (d), (e), (f), and (g) of this section, the term also includes any payment from any separate fund, regardless of the reason for the payment.

“Separate fund” includes a private or commercial annuity, an individual retirement account, and a pension, profit-sharing, stock-bonus, or stock ownership plan.

To the extent that payment is characterized as interest, a dividend, or a payment made in lieu of interest or a dividend, a trustee shall allocate the payment to income. The trustee shall allocate to principal the balance of the payment and any other payment received in the same accounting period that is not characterized as interest, a dividend, or an equivalent payment.

If no part of a payment is characterized as interest, a dividend, or an equivalent payment and all or part of the payment is required to be made, a trustee shall allocate to income 10 percent of the part that is required to be made during the accounting period and the balance to principal. If no part of a payment is required to be made or the payment received is the entire amount to which the trustee is entitled, the trustee shall allocate the entire payment to principal. For purposes of this subsection, a payment is not required to be made to the extent that it is made because the trustee exercises a right of withdrawal.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e) of this section, subsections (f) and (g) of this section apply and subsections (b) and (c) of this section do not apply in determining the allocation of a payment made from a separate fund to:

a trust to which an election to qualify for a marital deduction under Section 2056(b)(7) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, has been made; or

a trust that qualifies for the marital deduction under Section 2056(b)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.

Subsections (d), (f), and (g) of this section do not apply if and to the extent that the series of payments would, without the application of subsection (d), qualify for the marital deduction under Section 2056(b)(7)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.

A trustee shall determine the internal income of each separate fund for the accounting period as if the separate fund were a trust subject to this chapter. Upon request of the surviving spouse, the trustee shall demand that the person administering the separate fund distribute the internal income to the trust. The trustee shall allocate a payment from the separate fund to income to the extent of the internal income of the separate fund and distribute that amount to the surviving spouse. The trustee shall allocate the balance of the payment to principal. Upon request of the surviving spouse, the trustee shall allocate principal to income to the extent the internal income of the separate fund exceeds payments made from the separate fund to the trust during the accounting period.

If a trustee cannot determine the internal income of a separate fund but can determine the value of the separate fund, the internal income of the separate fund is deemed to equal four percent of the fund’s value, according to the most recent statement of value preceding the beginning of the accounting period. If the trustee can determine neither the internal income of the separate fund nor the fund’s value, the internal income of the fund is deemed to equal the product of the interest rate and the present value of the expected future payments and determined under Section 7520 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, for the month preceding the accounting period for which the computation is made.

This section does not apply to a payment to which section 3360 of this title applies.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 114

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

HistoryComment

Scope.

Section 3359 applies to amounts received under contractual arrangements that provide for payments to a third party beneficiary as a result of services rendered or property transferred to the payer.
While the right to receive such payments is a liquidating asset of the kind described in section 3360 (i.e., “an asset whose value will diminish or terminate because the asset is expected to produce receipts for a period of limited duration”), these payment rights are covered separately in section 3359 because of their special characteristics.

Section 3359 applies to receipts from all forms of annuities and deferred compensation arrangements, whether the payment will be received by the trust in a lump sum or in installments over a period of years.
It applies to bonuses that may be received over two or three years and payments that may last for much longer periods, including payments from an individual retirement account (IRA), deferred compensation plan (whether qualified or not qualified for special federal income tax treatment), and insurance renewal commissions.
It applies to a retirement plan to which the settlor has made contributions, just as it applies to an annuity policy that the settlor may have purchased individually, and it applies to variable annuities, deferred annuities, annuities issued by commercial insurance companies, and “private annuities” arising from the sale of property to another individual or entity in exchange for payments that are to be made for the life of one or more individuals.
The section applies whether the payments begin when the payment right becomes subject to the trust or are deferred until a future date, and it applies whether payments are made in cash or in kind, such as employer stock (in-kind payments usually will be made in a single distribution that will be allocated to principal under the second sentence of subsection (c)).

The 1962 Act.

Under section 12 of the 1962 Act, receipts from “rights to receive payments on a contract for deferred compensation” are allocated to income each year in an amount “not in excess of 5% per year” of the property’s inventory value.
While “not in excess of 5%” suggests that the annual allocation may range from zero to 5% of the inventory value, in practice the rule is usually treated as prescribing a 5% allocation.
The inventory value is usually the present value of all the future payments, and since the inventory value is determined as of the date on which the payment right becomes subject to the trust, the inventory value, and thus the amount of the annual income allocation, depends significantly on the applicable interest rate on the decedent’s date of death.
That rate may be much higher or lower than the average long-term interest rate.
The amount determined under the 5% formula tends to become fixed and remain unchanged even though the amount received by the trust increases or decreases.

Allocations under subsection 3359(b).

Subsection 3359(b) applies to plans whose terms characterize payments made under the plan as dividends, interest, or payments in lieu of dividends or interest.
For example, some deferred compensation plans that hold debt obligations or stock of the plan’s sponsor in an account for future delivery to the person rendering the services provide for the annual payment to that person of dividends received on the stock or interest received on the debt obligations.
Other plans provide that the account of the person rendering the services shall be credited with “phantom” shares of stock and require an annual payment that is equivalent to the dividends that would be received on that number of shares if they were actually issued; or a plan may entitle the person rendering the services to receive a fixed dollar amount in the future and provide for the annual payment of interest on the deferred amount during the period prior to its payment.
Under subsection 3359(b), payments of dividends, interest or payments in lieu of dividends or interest under plans of this type are allocated to income; all other payments received under these plans are allocated to principal.

Subsection 3359(b) does not apply to an IRA or an arrangement with payment provisions similar to an IRA.
IRAs and similar arrangements are subject to the provisions in subsection 3359(c).

Allocations under subsection 3359(c).

The focus of section 3359, for purposes of allocating payments received by a trust to or between principal and income, is on the payment right rather than on assets that may be held in a fund from which the payments are made.
Thus, if an IRA holds a portfolio of marketable stocks and bonds, the amount received by the IRA as dividends and interest is not taken into account in determining the principal and income allocation except to the extent that the Internal Revenue Service may require them to be taken into account when the payment is received by a trust that qualifies for the estate tax marital deduction (a situation that is provided for in subsection 3359(d)).
An IRA is subject to federal income tax rules that require payments to begin by a particular date and be made over a specific number of years or a period measured by the lives of one or more persons.
The payment right of a trust that is named as a beneficiary of an IRA is not a right to receive particular items that are paid to the IRA, but is instead the right to receive an amount determined by dividing the value of the IRA by the remaining number of years in the payment period.
This payment right is similar to the right to receive a unitrust amount, which is normally expressed as an amount equal to a percentage of the value of the unitrust assets without regard to dividends or interest that may be received by the unitrust.

An amount received from an IRA or a plan with a payment provision similar to that of an IRA is allocated under subsection 3359(c), which differentiates between payments that are required to be made and all other payments.
To the extent that a payment is required to be made (either under federal income tax rules or, in the case of a plan that is not subject to those rules, under the terms of the plan), 10% of the amount received is allocated to income and the balance is allocated to principal.
All other payments are allocated to principal because they represent a change in the form of a principal asset; section 3359 follows the rule in subdivision 3354(2), which provides that money or property received from a change in the form of a principal asset be allocated to principal.

Subsection 3359(c) produces an allocation to income that is similar to the allocation under the 1962 Act formula if the annual payments are the same throughout the payment period, and it is simpler to administer.
The amount allocated to income under section 3359 is not dependent upon the interest rate that is used for valuation purposes when the decedent dies, and if the payments received by the trust increase or decrease from year to year because the fund from which the payment is made increases or decreases in value, the amount allocated to income will also increase or decrease.

Marital deduction requirements.

When an IRA or other retirement arrangement (a “plan”) is payable to a marital deduction trust, the IRS treats the plan as a separate property interest that itself must qualify for the marital deduction.
IRS Revenue Ruling 2006-26 said that, as written, section 3359 does not cause a trust to qualify for the IRS’ safe harbors.
Revenue Ruling 2006-26 was limited in scope to certain situations involving IRAs and defined contribution retirement plans.
Without necessarily agreeing with the IRS’ position in that ruling, the revision to this section is designed to satisfy the IRS’ safe harbor and to address concerns that might be raised for similar assets.
No IRS pronouncements have addressed the scope of Internal Revenue Code § 2056(b)(7)(C).

Subsection (f) requires the trustee to demand certain distributions if the surviving spouse so requests.
The safe harbor of Revenue Ruling 2006-26 requires that the surviving spouse be separately entitled to demand the fund’s income (without regard to the income from the trust’s other assets) and the income from the other assets (without regard to the fund’s income).
In any event, the surviving spouse is not required to demand that the trustee distribute all of the fund’s income from the fund or from other trust assets. Treas. Reg. § 20.2056(b)-5(f)(8).

Subsection (f) also recognizes that the trustee might not control the payments that the trustee receives and provides a remedy to the surviving spouse if the distributions under subdivision (d)(1) are insufficient.

Subsection (g) addresses situations where, due to lack of information provided by the fund’s administrator, the trustee is unable to determine the fund’s actual income.
The bracketed language is the range approved for unitrust payments by Treas. Reg. § 1.643(b)-1.
In determining the value for purposes of applying the unitrust percentage, the trustee would seek to obtain the value of the assets as of the most recent statement of value immediately preceding the beginning of the year.
For example, suppose a trust’s accounting period is January 1 through December 31.
If a retirement plan administrator furnishes information annually each September 30 and declines to provide information as of December 31, then the trustee may rely on the September 30 value to determine the distribution for the following year.
For funds whose values are not readily available, subsection (g) relies on Internal Revenue Code section 7520 valuation methods because many funds described in section 3359 are annuities, and one consistent set of valuation principles should apply whether or not the fund is, in fact, an annuity.

Application of section 3324.

Subsection 3324(a) gives a trustee who is acting under the prudent investor rule the power to adjust from principal to income if, considering the portfolio as a whole and not just receipts from deferred compensation, the trustee determines that an adjustment is necessary.
See example (5) in the comment following section 3324.

§ 3360.
Liquidating asset.

As used in this section, “liquidating asset” means an asset whose value will diminish or terminate because the asset is expected to produce receipts for a period of limited duration. The term includes a leasehold, patent, copyright, royalty right, and right to receive payments during a period of more than one year under an arrangement that does not provide for the payment of interest on the unpaid balance. The term does not include a payment subject to section 3359 of this title, resources subject to section 3361 of this title, timber subject to section 3362 of this title, an activity subject to section 3364 of this title, an asset subject to section 3365 of this title, or any asset for which the trustee establishes a reserve for depreciation under section 3373 of this title.

A trustee shall allocate to income 10 percent of the receipts from a liquidating asset and the balance to principal.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 114

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

HistoryComment

Prior Acts.

Section 11 of the 1962 Act allocates receipts from “property subject to depletion” to income in an amount “not in excess of 5%” of the asset’s inventory value.
The 1931 Act has a similar 5% rule that applies when the trustee is under a duty to change the form of the investment.
The 5% rule imposes on a trust the obligation to pay a fixed annuity to the income beneficiary until the asset is exhausted.
Under both the 1931 and 1962 Acts the balance of each year’s receipts is added to principal.
A fixed payment can produce unfair results.
The remainder beneficiary receives all of the receipts from unexpected growth in the asset, e.g., if royalties on a patent or copyright increase significantly.
Conversely, if the receipts diminish more rapidly than expected, most of the amount received by the trust will be allocated to income and little to principal. Moreover, if the annual payments remain the same for the life of the asset, the amount allocated to principal will usually be less than the original inventory value.
For these reasons, section 3360 abandons the annuity approach under the 5% rule.

Lottery payments.

The reference in subsection (a) to rights to receive payments under an arrangement that does not provide for the payment of interest includes state lottery prizes and similar fixed amounts payable over time that are not deferred compensation arrangements covered by section 3359.

§ 3361.
Minerals, water, and other natural resources.

To the extent that a trustee accounts for receipts from an interest in minerals or other natural resources pursuant to this section, the trustee shall allocate them as follows:

If received as nominal delay rental or nominal annual rent on a lease, a receipt must be allocated to income.

If received from a production payment, a receipt must be allocated to income if and to the extent that the agreement creating the production payment provides a factor for interest or its equivalent. The balance must be allocated to principal.

If an amount received as a royalty, shut-in-well payment, take-or-pay payment, bonus, or delay rental is more than nominal, 90 percent must be allocated to principal and the balance to income.

If an amount is received from a working interest or any other interest not provided for in subdivision (1), (2), or (3) of this subsection, 90 percent of the net amount received must be allocated to principal and the balance to income.

An amount received on account of an interest in water that is renewable must be allocated to income. If the water is not renewable, 90 percent of the amount must be allocated to principal and the balance to income.

This chapter applies whether or not a decedent or donor was extracting minerals, water, or other natural resources before the interest became subject to the trust.

If a trust owns an interest in minerals, water, or other natural resources on July 1, 2012, the trustee may allocate receipts from the interest as provided in this chapter or in the manner used by the trustee prior to July 1, 2012. If the trust acquires an interest in minerals, water, or other natural resources after July 1, 2012, the trustee shall allocate receipts from the interest as provided in this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 114

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

HistoryComment

Prior Acts.

The 1962 Act allocates to principal as a depletion allowance, 27-1/2% of the gross receipts, but not more than 50% of the net receipts after paying expenses.
The Internal Revenue Code no longer provides for a 27-1/2% depletion allowance, although the major oil producing States have retained the 27-1/2% provision in their principal and income acts (Texas amended its Act in 1993, but did not change the depletion provision).
Section 9 of the 1931 Act allocates all of the net proceeds received as consideration for the “permanent severance of natural resources from the lands” to principal.

Section 3361 allocates 90% of the net receipts to principal and 10% to income.
A depletion provision that is tied to past or present Code provisions is undesirable because it causes a large portion of the oil and gas receipts to be paid out as income.
As wells are depleted, the amount received by the income beneficiary falls drastically.
Allocating a larger portion of the receipts to principal enables the trustee to acquire other income producing assets that will continue to produce income when the mineral reserves are exhausted.

Application of sections 3353 and 3358.

This section applies to the extent that the trustee does not account separately for receipts from minerals and other natural resources under section 3353 or allocate all of the receipts to principal under section 3358.

Open mine doctrine.

The purpose of subsection 3361(c) is to abolish the “open mine doctrine” as it may apply to the rights of an income beneficiary and a remainder beneficiary in receipts from the production of minerals from land owned or leased by a trust.
Instead, such receipts are to be allocated to or between principal and income in accordance with the provisions of this Act.
For a discussion of the open mine doctrine, see generally 3A Austin W. Scott & William F. Fratcher, The Law of Trusts § 239.3 (4th ed. 1988), and
Nutter v. Stockton,
626 P.2d 861, 1981 Okla. LEXIS 194, 1981 OK 30 (Okla. 1981).

Effective date provision.

Section 9(b) of the 1962 Act provides that the natural resources provision does not apply to property interests held by the trust on the effective date of the Act, which reflects concerns about the constitutionality of applying a retroactive administrative provision to interests in real estate, based on the opinion in the Oklahoma case of
Franklin v. Margay Oil Corporation,
153 P.2d 486, 501 (Okla. 1944).
Subsection 3361(d) permits a trustee to use either the method provided for in this Act or the method used before the Act takes effect. Lawyers in jurisdictions other than Oklahoma may conclude that retroactivity is not a problem as to property situated in their states, and this provision permits trustees to decide, based on advice from counsel in states whose law may be different from that of Oklahoma, whether they may apply this provision retroactively if they conclude that to do so is in the best interests of the beneficiaries.

If the property is in a state other than the state where the trust is administered, the trustee must be aware that the law of the property’s situs may control this question.
The outcome turns on a variety of questions: whether the terms of the trust specify that the law of a state other than the situs of the property shall govern the administration of the trust, and whether the courts will follow the terms of the trust; whether the trust’s asset is the land itself or a leasehold interest in the land (as it frequently is with oil and gas property); whether a leasehold interest or its proceeds should be classified as real property or personal property, and if as personal property, whether applicable state law treats it as a movable or an immovable for conflict of laws purposes.
See 5A Austin W. Scott & William F. Fratcher, The Law of Trusts § 648 at 531, 533-534; § 657 at 600 (4th ed. 1989).

§ 3362.
Timber.

To the extent that a trustee accounts for receipts from the sale of timber and related products pursuant to this section, the trustee shall allocate the net receipts:

to income to the extent that the amount of timber removed from the land does not exceed the rate of growth of the timber during the accounting periods in which a beneficiary has a mandatory income interest;

to principal to the extent that the amount of timber removed from the land exceeds the rate of growth of the timber or the net receipts are from the sale of standing timber;

to or between income and principal if the net receipts are from the lease of timberland or from a contract to cut timber from land owned by a trust, by determining the amount of timber removed from the land under the lease or contract and applying the rules in subdivision (1) and (2) of this subsection; or

to principal to the extent that advance payments, bonuses, and other payments are not allocated pursuant to subdivision (1), (2), or (3) of this subsection.

In determining net receipts to be allocated pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, a trustee shall deduct and transfer to principal a reasonable amount for depletion.

This chapter applies whether or not a decedent or transferor was harvesting timber from the property before it become subject to the trust.

If a trust owns an interest in timberland on July 1, 2012, the trustee may allocate net receipts from the sale of timber and related products as provided in this chapter or in the manner used by the trustee before July 1, 2012. If the trust acquires an interest in timberland after July 1, 2012, the trustee shall allocate net receipts from the sale of timber and related products as provided in this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 114

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

HistoryComment

Scope of section.

The rules in section 3362 are intended to apply to net receipts from the sale of trees and by-products from harvesting and processing trees without regard to the kind of trees that are cut or whether the trees are cut before or after a particular number of years of growth.
The rules apply to the sale of trees that are expected to produce lumber for building purposes, trees sold as pulpwood, and Christmas and other ornamental trees. Subsection (a) applies to net receipts from property owned by the trustee and property leased by the trustee.
The Act is not intended to prevent a tenant in possession of the property from using wood that he cuts on the property for personal, noncommercial purposes, such as a Christmas tree, firewood, mending old fences or building new fences, or making repairs to structures on the property.

Under subsection (a), the amount of net receipts allocated to income depends upon whether the amount of timber removed is more or less than the rate of growth.
The method of determining the amount of timber removed and the rate of growth is up to the trustee, based on methods customarily used for the kind of timber involved.

Application of sections 3353 and 3368.

This section applies to the extent that the trustee does not account separately for net receipts from the sale of timber and related products under section 3353 or allocate all of the receipts to principal under section 3368.
The option to account for net receipts separately under section 3353 takes into consideration the possibility that timber harvesting operations may have been conducted before the timber property became subject to the trust, and that it may make sense to continue using accounting methods previously established for the property.
It also permits a trustee to use customary accounting practices for timber operations even if no harvesting occurred on the property before it became subject to the trust.

§ 3363.
Property not productive of income.

If a marital deduction is allowed for all or part of a trust whose assets consist substantially of property that does not provide the spouse with sufficient income from or use of the trust assets, and if the amounts that the trustee transfers from principal to income under section 3324 of this title and distributes to the spouse from principal pursuant to the terms of the trust are insufficient to provide the spouse with the beneficial enjoyment required to obtain the marital deduction, the spouse may require the trustee to make property productive of income, convert property within a reasonable time, or exercise the power conferred by subsection 3324(a) of this title. The trustee may decide which action or combination of actions to take.

In cases not governed by subsection (a) of this section, proceeds from the sale or other disposition of an asset are principal without regard to the amount of income the asset produces during any accounting period.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 114

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

HistoryComment

Prior Acts’ Conflict with uniform Prudent Investor Act.

Section 2(b) of the Uniform Prudent Investor Act provides that “[a] trustee’s investment and management decisions respecting individual assets must be evaluated not in isolation but in the context of the trust portfolio as a whole . . .
.”
The underproductive property provisions in Section 12 of the 1962 Act and Section 11 of the 1931 Act give the income beneficiary a right to receive a portion of the proceeds from the sale of underproductive property as “delayed income.”
In each Act the provision applies on an asset by asset basis and not by taking into consideration the trust portfolio as a whole, which conflicts with the basic precept in Section 2(b) of the Prudent Investor Act. Moreover, in determining the amount of delayed income, the prior Acts do not permit a trustee to take into account the extent to which the trustee may have distributed principal to the income beneficiary, under principal invasion provisions in the terms of the trust, to compensate for insufficient income from the unproductive asset.
Under subdivision 3324(b)(7) of this Act, a trustee must consider prior distributions of principal to the income beneficiary in deciding whether and to what extent to exercise the power to adjust conferred by subsection 3324(a).

Duty to make property productive of income.

In order to implement the Uniform Prudent Investor Act, this Act abolishes the right to receive delayed income from the sale proceeds of an asset that produces little or no income, but it does not alter existing state law regarding the income beneficiary’s right to compel the trustee to make property productive of income.
As the law continues to develop in this area, the duty to make property productive of current income in a particular situation should be determined by taking into consideration the performance of the portfolio as a whole and the extent to which a trustee makes principal distributions to the income beneficiary under the terms of the trust and adjustments between principal and income under section 3324.

Trusts for which the value of the right to receive income is important for tax reasons may be affected by Treas. Reg. § 1.7520-3(b)(2)(v)
Example (1),
§ 20.7520-3(b)(2)(v)

Examples (1)

and

(2),

and § 25.7520-3(b)(2)(v)

Examples (1)

and

(2),

which provide that if the income beneficiary does not have the right to compel the trustee to make the property productive, the income interest is considered unproductive and may not be valued actuarially under those sections.

Marital deduction trusts.

Subsection (a) draws on language in Treas. Reg. § 20.2056(b)-5(f)(4) and (5) to enable a trust for a spouse to qualify for a marital deduction if applicable state law is unclear about the spouse’s right to compel the trustee to make property productive of income.
The trustee should also consider the application of section 3324 and the provisions of Restatement of Trusts 3d: Prudent Investor Rule § 240, at 186, app. § 240, at 252 (1992). Example (6) in the comment to section 3324 describes a situation involving the payment from income of carrying charges on unproductive real estate in which section 3324 may apply.

Once the two conditions have occurred — insufficient beneficial enjoyment from the property and the spouse’s demand that the trustee take action under this section — the trustee must act; but instead of the formulaic approach of the 1962 Act, which is triggered only if the trustee sells the property, this Act permits the trustee to decide whether to make the property productive of income, convert it, transfer funds from principal to income, or to take some combination of those actions.
The trustee may rely on the power conferred by subsection 3324(a) to adjust from principal to income if the trustee decides that it is not feasible or appropriate to make the property productive of income or to convert the property. Given the purpose of section 3363, the power under subsection 3324(a) would be exercised to transfer principal to income and not to transfer income to principal.

Section 3363 does not apply to a so-called “estate” trust, which will qualify for the marital deduction, even though the income may be accumulated for a term of years or for the life of the surviving spouse, if the terms of the trust require the principal and undistributed income to be paid to the surviving spouse’s estate when the spouse dies.
Treas. Reg. § 20.2056(c)-2(b)(1)(iii).